Illinois, session 104th, HB3366.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-20.9a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.9a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.9a)7    Sec. 10-20.9a. Final grade; promotion. 8    (a) Teachers shall administer the approved marking system 9or other approved means of evaluating pupil progress. The 10teacher shall maintain the responsibility and right to 11determine grades and other evaluations of students within the 12grading policies of the district based upon his or her 13professional judgment of available criteria pertinent to any 14given subject area or activity for which he or she is 15responsible. District policy shall provide the procedure and 16reasons by and for which a grade may be changed; provided that 17no grade or evaluation shall be changed without notification 18to the teacher concerning the nature and reasons for such 19change. If such a change is made, the person making the change 20shall assume such responsibility for determining the grade or 21evaluation, and shall initial such change.22    (b) School districts shall not promote students to the 23next higher grade level based upon age or any other social   HB3366- 2 -LRB104 10886 LNS 20968 b1reasons not related to the academic performance of the 2students. On or before September 1, 1998, school boards shall 3adopt and enforce a policy on promotion as they deem necessary 4to ensure that students meet local goals and objectives and 5can perform at the expected grade level prior to promotion. 6Decisions to promote or retain students in any classes shall 7be based on successful completion of the curriculum, 8attendance, performance based on the assessments required 9under Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code, the Iowa Test of Basic 10Skills, or other testing or any other criteria established by 11the school board. Students determined by the local district to 12not qualify for promotion to the next higher grade shall be 13provided remedial assistance, which may include, but shall not 14be limited to, a summer bridge program of no less than 90 15hours, tutorial sessions, increased or concentrated 16instructional time, modifications to instructional materials, 17and retention in grade.18    (c) No public high school of a school district shall 19withhold a student's grades, transcripts, or diploma because 20of an unpaid balance on the student's school account.21    At the end of each school year, the school district shall 22catalogue and report to the State Board of Education the total 23amount that remains unpaid by students due to the prohibition 24under this subsection (c). 25    (d) (Blank). On and after 3 years from the effective date 26of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly,   HB3366- 3 -LRB104 10886 LNS 20968 b1subsection (c) is inoperative. 2(Source: P.A. 102-727, eff. 5-6-22.)